Hawaii, session 2026, SB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $11,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the adult mental health inpatient program (HTH 430/HQ) to secure contracts for the provision of forty psychiatric beds annually to the Hawaii state hospital. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. Beginning with fiscal year 2027-2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department of health shall include in its annual budget request line-item funding for the adult mental health inpatient program (HTH 430/HQ) to secure contracts for the provision of psychiatric beds for the Hawaii state hospital.  To ensure the continuation of support services, the amount of funding requested shall scale proportionally with the number of psychiatric beds provided. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________